Missouri, session 2026, SB1387.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 194, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 194.118, to read as
follows:
194.118. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Sudden arrhythmic death syndrome (SADS)", the
sudden and unexpected death due to cardiac arrhythmia, as
determined by performance of an autopsy or a clinical
investigation, of a young, apparently healthy individual
with no previously diagnosed structural heart disease;
(2) "Sudden death in the young (SDY)", the sudden and
unexpected death of an individual younger than twenty years
of age due to natural causes, including, but not limited to,
sudden cardiac death or sudden unexpected death in epilepsy,
which death remains unexplained after initial investigation;
(3) "Sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS)", the sudden
death of an infant younger than one year of age which
remains unexplained after a thorough case investigation,
including performance of an autopsy, scene investigations,
and a review of clinical history;

SB 1387 2
(4) "Sudden unexpected infant death (SUID)", the
sudden and unexpected death of an infant younger than one
year of age, whether explained or unexplained, including,
but not limited to, death caused by SIDS, accidental
suffocation, and other potential causes;
(5) "SUID and SDY Case Registry", the national
surveillance system coordinated by the Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention and the National Institutes of Health
that collects standardized data on sudden and unexpected
deaths in individuals younger than twenty years of age.
2. In the case of an infant or child who dies suddenly
and unexpectedly, including cases of SIDS, SUID, or SDY, the
autopsy shall include microscopic and toxicology studies and
a review of the child's immunization and medical records
through the ShowMeVax system, or its successor registry,
from the child's primary health care provider, or from other
sources. The county coroner or medical examiner shall
document in the autopsy report any immunizations or
emergency countermeasures administered to the child within
ninety days before the child's death and report the case to
the SUID and SDY Case Registry in accordance with protocols
established by the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention and the department of health and senior services.
3. In the case of a sudden death suspected to be
caused by SADS in an individual of any age, the autopsy
shall include microscopic and toxicology studies and a
review of the individual's immunization and medical records,
as available through state health databases or other
sources. The county coroner or medical examiner shall
document in the autopsy report any immunizations or
emergency countermeasures administered to the individual
within ninety days before the individual's death and report

SB 1387 3
the case to the SUID and SDY Case Registry if the individual
was younger than twenty years old at the time of death, in
accordance with protocols established by the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention and the department.
4. The department shall impose the following
administrative penalties against a county coroner or medical
examiner who fails to report a case of SIDS, SUID, SDY, or
SADS for individuals younger than twenty years of age to the
SUID and SDY Case Registry within thirty days after
completing the autopsy report:
(1) For the first unreported case, a fine of up to one
thousand dollars; and
(2) For the second and each subsequent unreported
case, a fine of up to five thousand dollars. The department
shall report those coroners and medical examiners with a
license to practice in this state to their respective
professional licensing boards for disciplinary action, which
may include suspension or revocation of license.
✓